tests/ton.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../ton.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../ton.automorf.hfst
Tests:
  Adjectives: {}
  Affixes:
    efu<n><az>: efua
    fai<v><postadv>: faingataʻa
    kai<v><postadv>: kaingataʻa
    lango<v><az>: langoa
    mamate<n><az>: mamatea
    namu<n><az>: namua
    ongoongo<n><az>: ongoongoa
    ʻalu<v><postadv>: ʻalungataʻa
  Articles:
    he<adj><def>: he
    e<adj><def>: e
    ha<adj><ind>: ha
    he<adj><sdef>: he
    e<adj><sdef>: e
    pālangi<n><adj><def>: e pālangi
    pālangi<n><adj><ind>: ha pālangi
  Cardinal Pronouns:
    au<prn><postd><p1><exl><sg>: au
    ia<prn><postd><p3><sg>: ia
    ke<prn><prepd><p2><sg>: ke
    kimaua<prn><postd><p1><exl><du>: kimaua
    kimautolu<prn><postd><p1><exl><pl>: kimautolu
    kimoua<prn><postd><p2><du>: kimoua
    kimoutolu<prn><postd><p2><pl>: kimoutolu
    kinaua<prn><postd><p3><du>: kinaua
    kinautolu<prn><postd><p3><pl>: kinautolu
    kita<prn><postd><p1><incl><sg>: kita
    kitaua<prn><postd><p1><incl><du>: kitaua
    kitautolu<prn><postd><p1><incl><pl>: kitautolu
    koe<prn><postd><p2><sg>: koe
    ku<prn><prepd><p1><fti><exl><pl>: ku
    ma<prn><prepd><p1><exl><du>: ma
    mau<prn><prepd><p1><exl><pl>: mau
    mo<prn><prepd><p2><du>: mo
    mou<prn><prepd><p2><pl>: mou
    na<prn><prepd><p3><du>: na
    nau<prn><prepd><p3><pl>: nau
    ne<prn><prepd><p3><sg>: ne
    ou<prn><prepd><p1><pres><exl><sg>: ou
    ta<prn><prepd><p1><incl><du>: ta
    te<prn><prepd><p1><incl><sg>: te
    u<prn><prepd><p1><past><exl><du>: u
    ou<prn><prepd><p1><pres><exl><sg>: ou
  Imperatives:
    aʻhu<v><imp>: aʻhu
    mohe<v><imp>: mohe
    ʻalu<v><imp>: ʻalu

  Irregular Noun Pluralization:
    fefine<n><du>: fāfine
    mokopuna<n><du>: makapuna
    tehina<n><du>: fototehina
    tuofefine<n><du>: tuofāfine
  Nouns:
    efu<n><sg>: efu
    faifekau<n><sg>: faifekau
    fale<n><sg>: fale
    fili<n><sg>: fili
    hele<n><sg>: hele
    hoosi<n><sg>: hoosi
    kaiako<n><sg>: kaiako
    luo<n><sg>: luo
    mamate<n><sg>: mamate
    maŋa<n><sg>: maŋa
    namu<n><sg>: namu
    ongoongo<n><sg>: ongoongo
    pea<n><sg>: pea
    puaka<n><sg>: puaka
    tangata<n><sg>: tangata
    tohi<n><sg>: tohi
    toko<n><sg>: toko
  Partial Reduplication:
    kotoa<adj><emph>: katokatoa
    momoko<adj><emph>: mokomoko
    māfana<adj><emph>: mamāfana
    pakiua<v><emph>: pakipaki
  Parts of Speech: {}
  Plural Noun Markers:
    fanga<cl><pl>: fanga
    kau<cl><pl>: kau
    ngaahi<cl><pl>: ngaahi
    ongo<cl><du>: ongo
    ʻu<cl><pl>: ʻu
  Possessive Pronouns:
    haku<prn><poss><ind><p1><exl><sg><incl><ordinary>: haku
    siʻaku<prn><poss><ind><p1><exl><sg><emotional>: siʻaku
    hama<prn><poss><ind><p1><exl><du><ordinary>: hama
    siʻama<prn><poss><ind><p1><exl><du><emotional>: siʻama
    hamau<prn><poss><ind><p1><exl><pl><ordinary>: hamau
    siʻamau<prn><poss><ind><p1><exl><pl><emotional>: siʻamau

    hato<prn><poss><ind><p1><incl><sg><ordinary>: hato
    siʻato<prn><poss><ind><p1><incl><sg><emotional>: siʻato
    hata<prn><poss><ind><p1><<incl><du><ordinary>: hata
    siʻata<prn><poss><ind><p1><incl><du><emotional>: siʻata
    hatau<prn><poss><ind><p1><incl><pl><ordinary>: hatau
    siʻatau<prn><poss><ind><p1><incl><pl><emotional>: siʻatau

    hao<prn><poss><ind><p2><sg><ordinary>: hao
    siʻao<prn><poss><ind><p2><sg><emotional>: siʻao
    hamo<prn><poss><ind><p2><du><ordinary>: hamo
    siʻamo<prn><poss><ind><p2><du><emotional>: siʻamo
    hamou<prn><poss><ind><p2><pl><ordinary>: hamou
    siʻamou<prn><poss><ind><p2><pl><emotional>: siʻamou


    hano<prn><poss><ind><p3><sg><ordinary>: hano
    siʻano<prn><poss><ind><p3><sg><emotional>: siʻano
    hana<prn><poss><ind><p3><du><ordinary>: hana
    siʻana<prn><poss><ind><p3><du><emotional>: siʻana
    hanau<prn><poss><ind><p3><pl><ordinary>: hanau
    siʻanau<prn><poss><ind><p3><pl><emotional>: siʻanau

    hoku<prn><poss><def><p1><exl><sg><ordinary>: hoku
    siʻoku<prn><poss><def><p1><exl><sg><emotional>: siʻoku
    homa<prn><poss><def><p1><exl><du><ordinary>: homa
    siʻoma<prn><poss><def><p1><exl><du><emotional>: siʻoma
    homau<prn><poss><def><p1><exl><pl><ordinary>: homau
    siʻomau<prn><poss><def><p1><exl><pl><emotional>: siʻomau

    hoto<prn><poss><def><p1><incl><sg><ordinary>: hoto
    siʻoto<prn><poss><def><p1><incl><sg><emotional>: siʻoto
    hota<prn><poss><def><p1><incl><du><ordinary>: hota
    siʻota<prn><poss><def><p1><incl><du><emotional>: siʻota
    hotau<prn><poss><def><p1><incl><pl><ordinary>: hotau
    siʻotau<prn><poss><def><p1><incl><pl><emotional>: siʻotau

    ho<prn><poss><def><p2><sg><ordinary>: ho
    siʻo<prn><poss><def><p2><sg><emotional>: siʻo
    homo<prn><poss><def><p2><du><ordinary>: homo
    siʻomo<prn><poss><def><p2><du><emotional>: siʻomo
    homou<prn><poss><def><p2><pl><ordinary>: homou
    siʻomou<prn><poss><def><p2><pl><emotional>: siʻomou

    hono<prn><poss><def><p3><sg><ordinary>: hono
    siʻano<prn><poss><def><p3><sg><emotional>: siʻano
    hona<prn><poss><def><p3><du><ordinary>: hona
    siʻona<prn><poss><def><p3><du><emotional>: siʻona
    honau<prn><poss><def><p3><pl><ordinary>: honau
    siʻonau<prn><poss><def><p3><pl><emotional>: siʻonau

    hoʻoku<prn><poss><p1><exl><sg><emphatic>: hoʻoku
    hoʻomaua<prn><poss><p1><exl><du><emphatic>: hoʻomaua
    hoʻomautolu<prn><poss><p1><exl><pl><emphatic>: hoʻomautolu

    hoʻota<prn><poss><p1><incl><sg><emphatic>: hoʻota
    hoʻotaua<prn><poss><p1><incl><du><emphatic>: hoʻotaua
    hoʻotautolu<prn><poss><p1><incl><pl><emphatic>: hoʻotautolu

    hoʻona<prn><poss><p2><sg><emphatic>: hoʻona
    hoʻonauau<prn><poss><p2><du><emphatic>: hoʻonauau
    hoʻonautolu<prn><poss><p2><pl><emphatic>: hoʻonautolu

    hoʻou<prn><poss><p3><sg><emphatic>: hoʻou
    hoʻomoua<prn><poss><p3><du><emphatic>: hoʻomoua
    hoʻomoutolu<prn><poss><p3><pl><emphatic>: hoʻomoutolu

  Pronouns: {}
  Reduplication:
    kehe<adj><emph>: kehekehe
    māfana<adj><emph>: mamāfana
  Tense:
    ako<v>: ako
    aʻhu<v>: aʻhu
    inu<v>: inu
    kai<v>: kai
    mohe<v>: mohe
    ʻalu<v>: ʻalu
    ʻoku<aux><v><present>: ʻoku
    te<aux><v><fti>: te
    naʻa<aux><v><past>: naʻa
    
  Time Modifiers:
    kotoa<adj>: kotoa
    ʻanai<adj>: ʻanai
    ʻapo<adj>: ʻapo
    ʻapongipongi<adj>: ʻapongipongi
  Verbs: {}
